Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.437

Developmental disabilities endowment—Rules.

The department shall adopt rules for the implementation of policies established by the governing board in *RCW 43.70.731 through 43.70.736. Such rules will be consistent with those statutes and chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2010 c 271 s 202; 2009 c 565 s 12; 2000 c 120 s 9. Formerly RCW 43.70.737, 43.330.240.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.70.731 through 43.70.736 were recodified as RCW 43.330.431 through 43.330.436, respectively, pursuant to 2012 c 197 s 4.

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.